Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska48-816.02
Temporary relief; initial hearing; when held.

In any request for temporary relief under the Industrial Relations Act, the commission shall mandatorily hold the initial hearing within ten days from the date of the filing.

Laws 1984, LB 832, § 4;

Laws 1986, LB 809, § 6.